Tennessee statutes. Title 64 Regional Authorities
Part 3

Tri-County Railroad Authority

64-2-301. Creation — Purpose.

There is hereby created the Tri-county railroad authority in the counties of Coffee, Warren and White.

This authority is intended to secure economic benefits to the above counties and to the cities of Manchester, Doyle, McMinnville, Morrison, Tullahoma and Sparta by providing for the continuation of railroad service in Coffee, Warren and White counties.

Acts 1981, ch. 542 (Orig. Compl. as Priv. Acts 1981, ch. 57), § 1; T.C.A., §66-2-301.

Compiler's Notes. The Tri-county railroad authority, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2028. See §§4-29-112,4-29-249.

Cross-References. Purposes enumerated, §64-2-313.

64-2-302. Effective date.

This part shall take effect when:

Two (2) or more of the counties of Coffee, Warren and White and the cities of Manchester, Doyle, McMinnville, Morrison, Tullahoma and Sparta are authorized by a majority vote of their respective governing bodies to become members of the authority;

Evidence of such authorization is proclaimed and countersigned by the presiding officer of each ratifying county and city and certified by that presiding officer to the secretary of state; and

The governing bodies of all governments voting to become members of the authority have indicated their willingness to appropriate sufficient funds to provide for the initial administration of the authority.

Acts 1981, ch. 542 (Orig. Compl. as Priv. Acts 1981, ch. 57), § 16; T.C.A., §66-2-302.

64-2-303. Powers.

Within the region of the authority, it may acquire, construct, operate, maintain and dispose of railroad facilities, properties and equipment, and may in addition to continuing the above-mentioned railroad service, provide any other rail service in the region as it is needed and feasible.

The acquisition, construction, operation and maintenance of such properties and facilities are hereby declared to be public and governmental functions. The powers granted in this section, in connection therewith, are declared to be public and corporate purposes and matters of public necessity.

The authority may use any property, right-of-way, easement or other similar property right necessary or convenient in connection with the acquisition, improvement, operation or maintenance of the facilities authorized in this section, held by the state or any county or municipality in the state; provided, that such governmental agency consents to such use, and that there is compliance with all statutes, regulations and procedures regulating the use, management and disposition of state property.

Acts 1981, ch. 542 (Orig. Compl. as Priv. Acts 1981, ch. 57), §§ 1, 2, 12; T.C.A., §66-2-303.

64-2-304. Organization and operation — Board of directors — Officers and employees.

The organization of the authority shall be as follows:

The authority shall be governed by a board of directors;

Membership of the board of directors shall consist of:

The county judge or county mayor of each county becoming a member of the authority, in accordance with § 64-2-302;

The mayor of each city becoming a member of the authority, in accordance with § 64-2-302;

One (1) member to be selected by the governing body of each county and city becoming members of the authority. The term of each selected member shall be prescribed by the governing body making the selection; and

The county mayor and the mayor of each city whose governing body is a member of the authority may select a representative to the board of directors to serve in their respective steads. Any such person selected shall otherwise meet the requirements of subdivision (3)(C) and shall be approved by, and each person's term prescribed by, the governing body of the respective county or city, except the term of the person selected shall not extend past the remaining term of the elected official who selected the person. The person selected and approved by the respective governing body shall serve on the board of directors in the place of the official who selected the person and in all respects shall have the full powers and duties of a member of the board;

In the event of failure to elect a successor to any member of the board, the member whose term has expired shall continue to serve until the member's successor has been duly elected as provided in this section;

In the event of the death or resignation of a member of the board or the member's inability to serve prior to the expiration of the member's term, the member's successor shall be elected for the unexpired term by the remaining members of the board within thirty (30) days of the event;

Any person at least twenty-five (25) years of age who has resided within the boundaries of the authority for a period of at least one (1) year immediately preceding such person's election is eligible to serve as a member of the board of directors of the authority. Any director who ceases to regularly reside within the boundaries of the authority shall automatically become ineligible to serve in such office;

Before entering upon their duties, all directors shall take and subscribe to an oath of office, as provided by the constitution and law for county and city officers. Copies of the oath of each director shall be filed with the county clerk of the applicable county;

A majority of the directors shall constitute a quorum, and the directors shall act by vote of a majority present at any meeting attended by a quorum. Vacancies among the directors shall not affect their power and authority, so long as a quorum remains. Within thirty (30) days after their election as provided in this section, the directors shall hold a meeting to elect a chair. The directors shall hold meetings at such times and places as the directors may determine;

Special meetings may be called and held upon such notice and in such manner as the board may by resolution determine. Save as otherwise expressly provided, the board of directors shall establish its own rules of procedure;

The directors shall designate a secretary and a treasurer, or one (1) person as secretary-treasurer, and such person need not be a director. The secretary shall attend all regular and special meetings and keep minutes thereof. The minutes of meetings shall be available for inspection by the public at the office of the authority at all reasonable times;

The board, by resolution, shall require the treasurer or the secretary-treasurer to execute a bond with an approved corporate surety, in such amount as the board may specify, for the faithful performance of the treasurer's or secretary-treasurer's duties and the accounting of all moneys and revenues that may come into the treasurer's or secretary-treasurer's hands. Such bonds shall be filed with the secretary of state;

The board, by resolution, may require all other subordinate officers or employees to execute such fidelity bonds for the faithful performance of their duties and the accounting of funds that may come to their hands, in such an amount, with such conditions and such sureties, as the board may determine;

All members of the board shall serve without compensation but may receive any per diem allowance that may be appropriated by the governing body of the county or city electing a director, for such director. Reasonable expenses incurred by members of the board while engaged in the business of the authority are subject to reimbursement by the authority;

The directors shall be indemnified by the authority for any liability they might incur while acting in such capacity other than for culpable negligence; and

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the directors shall be removable only for good cause and after preferment of charges, as provided by law for county officers.

Acts 1981, ch. 542 (Orig. Compl. as Priv. Acts 1981, ch. 57), § 3; T.C.A., §66-2-304; Acts 1994, ch. 597, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2008, ch. 1042, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Oath of office, Tenn. Const. art. X, § 1; §§8-18-107 —8-18-114.

Removal from office, Tenn. Const. art. VII, § 1; title 8, ch. 47.

64-2-305. Employees, professional staff and advisors.

The directors are authorized to employ and fix the compensation of architects, attorneys, engineers, superintendents, consultants, professional advisors and other subordinate officers and employees as may be necessary for the efficient management and operation of the authority and its facilities. Such persons shall continue in the employment of the authority at the will and pleasure of the board of directors. Such employment or contracts shall conform to the statutes, regulations and procedures to which counties must generally adhere in making such transactions.

Acts 1981, ch. 542 (Orig. Compl. as Priv. Acts 1981, ch. 57), § 4; T.C.A., §66-2-305.

64-2-306. Powers and duties of directors.

The directors have the following duties and powers and, in exercising such duties and powers shall abide by all statutes, regulations and procedures to which counties must generally adhere in making such transactions:

Acquire, construct, purchase, operate, maintain, replace, repair, rebuild, extend and improve within the boundaries of the authority the properties and facilities described in § 64-2-303(a) and to make such properties and facilities available to any firm, person, public or private corporation or to any other shipper, consignee or carrier and to charge for their use and for any and all services performed by the authority;

Accept donations to the authority of cash, lands or other property to be used in the furtherance of the purpose of this part;

Accept grants, loans or other financial assistance from any federal, state, county or municipal agency, or other aid for the acquisition or improvement of any of the facilities of the authority;

Purchase, rent, lease or otherwise acquire any and all kinds of property, real, personal or mixed, tangible or intangible, whether or not subject to mortgages, liens, charges or other encumbrances, for the authority, that, in the judgment of the directors, is necessary or convenient to carry out the purpose of the authority;

Acquire property that is suitable for use by industries requiring access to any railroad track owned, operated or subsidized by the authority;

Make contracts and execute instruments containing such covenants, terms and conditions as, in the judgment of the directors, may be necessary, proper or advisable for the purpose of obtaining grants, loans or other financial assistance from any federal or state agency for or in the aid of the acquisition or improvement of the facilities provided in this part;

Make all other contracts and execute all other instruments, including, without limitation, licenses, long or short term leases, mortgages and deeds of trust, and other agreements relating to property and facilities under its jurisdiction, and the construction, operation, maintenance, repair and improvement thereof, as in the judgment of the board of directors may be necessary, proper or advisable for the furtherance of the purpose of this part, and the full exercise of the powers granted in this section; and

Carry out and perform the covenants, terms and conditions of all such contracts or instruments;

Establish schedules of tolls, fees, rates, charges and rentals for the use of the properties and facilities under its jurisdiction, and for services that it may render;

Enter upon any lands and premises for the purpose of making surveys, soundings and examination in connection with the acquisition, improvement, operation or maintenance of any of the facilities of the authority;

Promulgate and enforce such rules and regulations as the board of directors may deem proper for the orderly administration of the authority and the efficient operation of its facilities; and

Do all acts and things necessary or deemed necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in this part. This subdivision (a)(10) shall not be construed to authorize the directors, in doing all things necessary and convenient, to conduct the administrative and business affairs of the authority in a manner inconsistent with the statutes, regulations and procedures governing such matters in county government.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this part, the directors shall have full and exclusive control of and responsibility for the administration of properties and facilities constructed or acquired pursuant to this part. The authority may lease or license lands or facilities under its jurisdiction for operation by private persons or corporations. This subsection (b) shall not be construed to authorize the directors to exercise such authority in a manner inconsistent with the statutes, regulations and procedures governing such matters in county government.

Acts 1981, ch. 542 (Orig. Compl. as Priv. Acts 1981, ch. 57), §§ 5, 6; T.C.A., §66-2-306.

Code Commission Notes.

The former last sentence of subdivision (a)(4), former subdivision (a)(6)(D), and the former last sentence of subdivision (a)(9) were duplicative of the provisions of the introductory paragraph of subsection (a); therefore, they were deleted by the code commission in 2010.

64-2-307. Eminent domain.

The authority is hereby authorized and empowered to condemn, in the name of the authority, any land, easements or rights-of-way in the boundaries of the authority that, in the opinion of the board of directors, are necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this part as set forth in §§ 64-2-301 and 64-2-303(a). Title to property so condemned shall be taken by and in the name of the authority, and the property shall thereafter be entrusted to the authority for the purposes of this part. Such condemnation proceedings shall be in accordance with title 29, chapters 16 and 17.

Where title to any property sought to be condemned is defective, it shall be passed by the judgment or decree of the court. Where condemnation proceedings become necessary, the court in which any such proceedings are filed shall, upon application by the authority and upon posting of a bond with the clerk of the court in such amount as the court may deem commensurate with the value of the property, order that a writ of possession shall issue immediately, or as soon and upon such terms as the court, in its discretion, may deem proper and just.

Acts 1981, ch. 542 (Orig. Compl. as Priv. Acts 1981, ch. 57), § 7; T.C.A., §66-2-307.

64-2-308. Funds and funding.

The authority has the powers with respect to finance as follows and, in exercising such powers, shall abide by all statutes, regulations and procedures to which counties must generally adhere in such matters:

To borrow money for any of its corporate purposes and issue its bonds for its corporate purposes, including refunding bonds, in such form and upon such terms as it may determine, payable out of any revenues of the authority, including grants or contributions from the federal government or other sources, which bonds may be sold at public sale;

Revenue bonds may be issued for the above purposes and the authority may pledge as security for such bonds all or any portion of the tolls, fees, rents, charges or any other revenues derived from the operation of the railroad and related uses of the properties. Any such fees, rents or charges so pledged that are fixed and established pursuant to a lease or contract are not subject to revision or change except in such manner as is provided in such lease or contract;

Any bonds issued pursuant to this part shall state on their face that they are payable as to principal and interest solely from revenues of the authority and shall not constitute a debt of the state or any political subdivision thereof other than the authority, and shall not constitute any indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation or restriction. Neither a director of the authority nor any person executing such bonds shall be liable personally thereon by reason of the issuance thereof;

In case any of the directors or officers of the authority whose signatures appear on any bonds or coupons cease to be directors or officers after authorization but before delivery of the bonds, their signatures shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes;

Any provision of the law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds issued pursuant to this part are fully negotiable;

Any bond reciting in substance that it has been issued by the authority pursuant to this part and for a purpose or purposes authorized by this part shall be conclusively deemed, in any suit, action or proceeding involving the validity or enforceability of the bond or the security for the bond, to have been issued pursuant to this part and for such purpose or purposes;

Obligations issued by the authority pursuant to this part are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and shall be exempt from taxation by the state or by any county, municipality or taxing district of the state, except inheritance, transfer and estate taxes;

With respect to refunding bonds, title 9, chapter 21 applies; with respect to funding bonds, § 9-11-108 applies; and

To receive funds from county or city governments for purposes of planning, the acquisition of properties and facilities and the construction, operation, management and maintenance of all properties and facilities, to which end such governments are authorized to provide funds for any of these purposes, upon grant or loan, and are empowered, but not required, to impose taxes to accomplish the purposes of this part.

Acts 1981, ch. 542 (Orig. Compl. as Priv. Acts 1981, ch. 57), §§ 8, 11; T.C.A., §66-2-308; Acts 1989, ch. 403, § 8; 2005, ch. 396, § 16.

64-2-309. Operating revenues.

The revenues derived from the operation of the properties and facilities authorized and the proceeds derived from the sale, transfer, lease or other disposition of any land or other facilities shall be applied and used as follows:

The payment of all operating expenses of the authority, except that the proceeds derived from the sale, transfer or other disposition of any land or other facilities shall not be used for this purpose;

The establishment of necessary reserves for contingencies, depreciation, maintenance, replacement of properties and facilities, storage and transfer facilities and any other facilities or other purposes as may be required under any bond indenture or as the authority directors may deem necessary or desirable. This subdivision (a)(2) shall not be construed to authorize the authority to exercise these provisions in a manner inconsistent with statutes, regulations or procedures governing such matters in county government; and

Any revenue or proceeds remaining after all the above items have been provided for shall be held and used for the further development of and for additions to the authority facilities and for the acquisition or construction of new facilities that may become necessary or desirable to further the purposes of this part. None of such revenues shall go into the general funds of the participating counties, except as may be directed by the authority directors.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the authority to administer these provisions in a manner inconsistent with statutes, regulations or procedures governing such transactions and activities carried out by county governments, and the authority shall assure that procedures and practices covered by this section conform with statutes, regulations and procedures to which county governments must adhere. All revenues shall be received, deposited and accounted for and all financial transactions shall be handled consistent with the requirements of statutes, regulations and procedures affecting county government.

Acts 1981, ch. 542 (Orig. Compl. as Priv. Acts 1981, ch. 57), § 10; T.C.A., §66-2-309.

64-2-310. Contracts.

All contracts of the authority shall be entered into and executed in such manner as may be prescribed by statutes, regulations and procedures governing contracting by county governments, but no contract or acquisition by purchase of equipment, apparatus, materials or supplies involving more than five hundred dollars ($500) or for construction, installation, repair or improvement of the property or facilities involving more than five hundred dollars ($500) shall be made except after such contract has been advertised for bids. Advertisement is not required when an emergency arises and requires immediate delivery of the supplies or performance of the service.

Acts 1981, ch. 542 (Orig. Compl. as Priv. Acts 1981, ch. 57), § 11; T.C.A., §66-2-310.

Cross-References. Purchases through department of general services, §12-3-1001.

64-2-311. Annual report.

The board of directors of the authority shall report annually to the governing bodies of the various counties and cities within the boundaries of the authority.

Such reports shall include statements of financial receipts and expenditures and a summary of activities and accomplishments for the period and proposed plans for the next year and for subsequent years.

Acts 1981, ch. 542 (Orig. Compl. as Priv. Acts 1981, ch. 57), § 9; T.C.A., §66-2-311.

64-2-312. Audit of operations.

The board of directors of the authority shall cause an annual audit to be made of the books and records of the authority. Within thirty (30) days after receipt by the authority, a copy of the annual audit shall be filed with the clerk or recorder of the appropriate county or municipality, who shall then distribute copies to members of the appropriate legislative body. Within thirty (30) days after receipt by the authority, a copy of the annual audit shall also be filed with the chief administrative officer of the appropriate county or municipality. The comptroller of the treasury, through the department of audit, shall be responsible for determining that such audits are prepared in accordance with generally accepted governmental auditing standards and that such audits meet the minimum standards prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury.

These audits shall be prepared by certified public accountants or by the department of audit. If the board of directors of the authority shall fail or refuse to have the audit prepared, then the comptroller of the treasury may appoint a certified public accountant or direct the department of audit to prepare the audit, the cost of such audit to be paid by the authority.

The comptroller of the treasury is authorized to modify the requirements for an audit as set out in this section for the authority whose activity, in the comptroller of the treasury's judgment, is not sufficient to justify the expenses of a complete audit.

Acts 1981, ch. 542 (Orig. Compl. as Priv. Acts 1981, ch. 57), § 9; T.C.A., §66-2-312; Acts 2005, ch. 396, § 18.

64-2-313. Liberal construction.

This part is remedial in nature and shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes of:

Promoting the movement and transfer of people, goods and merchandise to, from and through the boundaries of the authority;

Encouraging utilization of the natural resources therein; and

Promoting the growth and development of commerce and industry in the counties and cities.

Such liberal construction shall not work to override the application of the general statutes, regulations or procedures to the administrative or financial management practices of the authority in the same manner as they apply to county governments.

Acts 1981, ch. 542 (Orig. Compl. as Priv. Acts 1981, ch. 57), § 15; T.C.A., §66-2-313.

64-2-314. Part supplemental to other laws.

The powers, authority and rights conferred by this part are in addition and supplemental to, and the limitations imposed by this part do not affect the powers conferred by, any other general, special or local law.

Acts 1981, ch. 542 (Orig. Compl. as Priv. Acts 1981, ch. 57), § 13; T.C.A., §66-2-314.